Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-14] Development of geothermal
resources on Maui. To the extent an applicant's proposed project includes
the development of geothermal resources on the island of Maui and the delivery
of electric energy generated from these resources to the island of Oahu through
the cable system, this chapter shall apply to that proposed project. [L 1988, c
301, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next